Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB201.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7312(a) and (e) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7312. Organization.This agency shall consist of and be organized substantially as follows:(a) Council.--Primary responsibility for overall policy and direction of a Statewide civil defense and disaster program and response capability of the type hereinafter prescribed shall be vested in a body legally known as the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Council, which shall be composed of: the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Adjutant General, Secretary of Health, Attorney General, General Counsel, Secretary of [Community 1234567891011121314151617 Affairs] Community and Economic Development, Secretary of Environmental Protection, Secretary of Transportation, Secretary of Agriculture, Secretary of [Public Welfare] Human Services, Commissioner of the Pennsylvania State Police, Chairman of the Public Utility Commission, State Fire Commissioner, Speaker of the House of Representatives, President pro tempore of the Senate, Minority Leader of the Senate and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. The Speaker of the House of Representatives, President pro tempore of the Senate, Minority Leader of the Senate and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives may authorize a member of their respective Houses of the General Assembly to serve in their stead. The Governor may authorize up to two representatives of business and industry, up to two representatives of labor, up to two public members at large and one representative respectively of the Pennsylvania State Association of County Commissioners, the Pennsylvania State Association of Township Commissioners, the Pennsylvania State Association of Township Supervisors, the Pennsylvania League of Cities and the Pennsylvania State Association of Boroughs to be nonvoting members of the council. The Governor may designate a member to serve as chairman. Five members shall constitute a quorum.* * *(e) State director.--To supervise the work and activities comprising the State Civil Defense and Disaster Program, the Governor shall appoint, subject to the consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate, an individual to act, on a full-time basis, as director of the agency. The director shall perform all such fiscal, planning, administrative, operational and other duties as may be assigned to him by the council and 20250SB0201PN0133 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall act as the chairman's principal assistant in civil defense and disaster matters. The director or the director's designee is also the State coordinating officer responsible to coordinate and supervise the Commonwealth and local disaster response effort following a presidential declaration of an emergency or a major disaster.* * *Section 2. The amendment of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7312(e) shall apply to directors of the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency who are appointed after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0201PN0133 - 3 - 1234567891011